District of Columbia statutes.
38-841.05

Designation of Title IX athletic coordinators.

(a)

OSSE shall designate a Title IX Coordinator for the District’s interscholastic athletics who shall coordinate the District’s efforts to ensure and encourage compliance with the athletics aspects of Title IX and this chapter. The responsibilities of the Title IX Coordinator shall include those described in 34 C.F.R. § 106.8(a). OSSE shall annually notify all students and the students’ guardians of and make publicly available on a website the name, office address, e-mail address, and phone number of the Title IX Coordinator designated pursuant to this section. Each applicable school shall post a notice with this information in the school’s athletic facilities.

(b)

Each LEA shall designate an LEA Title IX Athletic Coordinator who shall oversee and monitor each applicable school within the LEA to ensure and encourage compliance with the athletic aspects of Title IX and this chapter; and

(c)

Each applicable school shall designate a School Title IX Athletic Liaison, in accordance with 34 C.F.R. § 106.8(a), who coordinates the activities at the school level that are designed to promote gender equity in athletics. The School Title IX Athletic Liaison is not required to, but may, serve as one of the 3 members of the GERC. Additionally, the School Title IX Athletic Liaison shall:

(1)

Receive and process complaints and inquiries related to Title IX and athletics;

(2)

Make recommendations to the school’s GERC on promoting gender equity in athletics;

(3)

Maintain the school’s Title IX records as described in § 38-841.04(c);

(4)

Enforce the school’s athletic non-discrimination policy, if any; and

(5)

Implement corrective measures to comply with Title IX.

(d)

If an applicable school is also an LEA, the LEA Title IX Athletic Coordinator shall carry out the responsibilities of both the LEA Title IX Athletic Coordinator and the School Title IX Athletic Liaison.

History

Oct. 21, 2015, D.C. Law 21-29, § 6, 62 DCR 10884